MiKTeX/default/texmflocal/hunspell/dicts/ruen_RUGB.dic
abstract/iTPDGVhYS
acknowledge/LRShDG
adze/MGSD
alias/DGS
animadvert/SDG
arc/DSMG
avoid/RD7lSG
barrack/SDG
benumb/SDG
blackberry/SGM
bookmark/SMDG
bugle/RDGMS
carry/DaSG
chitchat/DSGM
cleave/GDRS
company/SDMG
constipate/SnDGN
countersink/SG
crouch/SDG
database/GDSM
destroy/RSDG7
doc/SMDRG
dung/GMDS
encourage/SGLkD
eschew/GSD
explode/SuRGNXVvD
fizzle/DGS
footnote/DGSM
freelance/RMGDS
gavotte/GMDS
grok/SDG
hard-wire/DSG
hit/SRMpG
imbue/DGS
inflict/DGS
irrupt/DSVG
lath/yMRDSG
lose/RJSG
mechanize/BNGDn
modify/BnDGRSN
nab/SDG
off-road/G
pack/MDGJR7S
pep/GSRMD2Z
placate/DnVySGN
prick/DYRGS
pump/SMDG
ramify/DGnSN
redress/G
renew/DG7S
role-play/DG
sanctify/NnSGD
sculpt/DGS
shimmy/DMGS
slice/DMRSG
snorkel/MDRGS
spool/SDRGM
stomp/SDG
suffice/DSG
sync/DGS
tic/RDG
transition/MDG
tusk/DRGMS
update/DSG
vindicate/nDSGN
wheel/MDRGS
wolf/DMSG
accentuate/SDNnG
alloy/MDGS
arrow/MDGS
back/SRJpDGM
bead/mDGMJSZ
bestrew/SDG
bloc/DGSRM
bootleg/DRSG
broach/SDG
busy/TGPSYD
casserole/GMDS
chicane/MDySG
clinch/RSDGk
conjure/NDnRGS
cough/SGD
crop/RMGSD
dam/SMGD
decrement/MDSG
deviate/NDSGn
dogleg/GSMD
dungeon/DSMG
emit/NRSXDG
entwine/DGS
expound/RSDG
fissure/DSMG
fog/CDSG
free-wheel/GSD
garble/SDG
glow/RSMkDG
hacksaw/DGMS
hobble/RGDS
hustle/RSDG
infatuate/nSGND
intermingle/SGD
joggle/DSG
lark/MDSG
lib/MnGSD
magazine/GSDM
mention/DRGS7
moo/SDG
negotiate/DNASGn
operate/FSNDG
patent/7DSMGY
pillow/DGSM
portray/GSD
privilege/SDGM
pupate/SDG
rappel/GSD
redial/GD
renovate/NDnSG
retch/SGD
roller-skate/GDMS
scrabble/GDS
sentinel/MGSD
sit/AGS
sort/DFGKSA
square/YPSMDGT
stoop/DGS
subdivide/XGDNS
swank/TzSZ2GD
temporise/DRSGk
tool/MGDS
truckle/SGD
upbraid/DGS
volunteer/DSMG
wimple/SGMD
abhor/DGS
affiance/GSD
anaesthetize/NnDRSG
arrogate/nSDGN
backfire/GSD
becloud/SDG
blah/DMGS
brace/DJGkMS
budge/DSG
callous/SGPDY
cast/cSAaGe
cheek/2SZzMDG
coax/okRG
convict/DGSV
creosote/DMSG
dart/DRGMS
demonstrate/DSvGnNVu
devour/RDGS
disproportionate/DG
drawl/GSDk
eddy/DMSG
enfold/DGS
example/MSDG
fake/RSGD
flame-proof/DG
ford/DM7GS
gabble/GSD
glint/SGD
grin/SDG
hark/SDG
honk/RSDMG
image/GDMSy
insulate/NnSDG
jam/UDG
know/7GkSJ
litigate/nDSNG
manacle/DGMS
menace/SDGk
moralise/CRDGS
negate/SGD
occur/AGDS
participate/nVNGyDS
pickle/DGMS
plight/MDGS
pressurise/RnDSG
psychoanalyse/SGWD
queue-jump/G
reconnoitre/DSG
reject/DGVRS
restart/G
rollick/DkSG
scathe/kGD
self-destruct/DVSG
sight-read/GR
slough/MDGS
sparkle/RSkDG
stencil/GSDJM
stuff/cDG
superintend/SDG
swizzle/MDG
testify/RSGD
toddle/RDSG
truncate/DnSGN
upright/GYSD
wall/SGMD
wholesale/MRDGS
yarn/SMGD
acquiesce/SGD
ambulate/GDNnSy
armour/SZMRDG
backwash/DMSG
belt/MSGD
blackguard/DMGYS
brainstorm/MJSDG
buttock/GDMS
catapult/DMGS
chirp/DGSZ
closure/SDMG
compassionate/PGDS
convect/xVSDG
crime/MSDG
damp/TRSYGPD
deflate/GDnSN
detox/DGS
disseminate/GNnDS
duplex/GDSM
engulf/LSDG
evaporate/NnDGSvV
expurgate/NnSDG
fit/6TRGMYJPSDj
foresee/GSRB
gambol/SDG
gown/DMSG
gurgle/SGD
hive/SGMD
hound/SGMD
impregnate/NBGDSn
interface/GMDS
jangle/RDGYS
kit/MDGZrS
lazy/YDTPGS
lord/cMSDG
masticate/SDG
monkey/MGDS
nil/MYG
organise/EnDSAG
par/dDZG7S
people/SDGM
plait/DGSM
pre-empt/DGVvS
program/RGADS
purchase/DASRG
ratify/GnDRSN
rectify/7RGNnSD
remelt/G
revile/RSGDL
rusticate/SDG
scuff/DGS
shingle/GMSD
simplify/RSGnND
smash/DRkSG
spit/RSG
squirrel/DSYMG
stylize/nDGNS
swap/RGSD
telecast/RSG
tock/MGSD
trench/AGDS
uncouple/G
verge/FDSG
wilt/GSD
accelerate/SkNDGVn
amalgamate/DGS
ask/RGDS
authenticate/SGD
beagle/MGSD
bilge/MSGD
blurt/GDS
brine/MZSDG
bushwhack/DGRS
cartoon/GMDS3
chomp/DSG
clutch/SGD
confection/RM3DGS
counterweight/MDSG
crowbar/DMGS
defy/DGSRk
detoxify/NnDGS
domesticate/DGS
drug/SGDM
electrocute/DSG
enfeeble/GLSD
estimate/DSncNfG
extenuate/SNnDG
figure/FGDRnSN
focus/CSdADG
frank/DTPSYG
gaggle/SDG
glimpse/GRMSD
gravitate/nVSDxGN
hairstyle/3GMS
hibernate/SGNDn
immure/DGS
inhere/DSG
inundate/GSNn
key/GMDS
legitimise/SGD
loom/DGSM
massage/DSGM
mistime/G
muzzle/USDG
obligate/xnDyNSG
over-ride/GS
partake/RSG
perform/RG7DS
poach/DSGR
prawn/GSMD
punctuate/xSGNDn
raze/SDG
relinquish/DLSG
retain/RGSD
row/MRDGS
scrimp/GSD
shipwreck/MDGS
skivvy/MDSG
sneak/DGSZz2k
specify/ASGD
stagnate/DnSGN
stroll/DGRS
swab/SGDM
temporize/RGkDS
trap/JMDRGS
uncurl/G
ventilate/SVDnGN
watermark/MDSG
word/AJGSD
Арденны/O
Богучаны/O
Гималаи/O
Кижи/O
Ленин/G
Ливны/O
Павел/O
Салоники/O
Сумы/O
Хибины/O
Челны/O
Черусти/O
абхазец/O
австралиец/O
автоколебания/O
агарянин/O
азербайджанец/O
акулий/O
алименты/O
алтаец/O
ангелок/O
англосаксонец/O
анналы/O
апачи/O
аргентинец/O
армянин/O
ассириянин/O
ахи/O
бабий/O
базофилы/O
баловень/O
барашек/O
басок/O
бачок/O
беженец/O
белогвардеец/O
бенгалец/O
берлинец/O
бесенок/G
бивень/O
биточек/O
бобок/O
боеприпасы/O
болгарин/O
борзописец/O
бочажок/O
боярин/O
братья/O
брезгливец/O
бродяжий/O
брусочек/O
брюки/O
бубны/O
бугры/O
букетец/O
бурундучок/O
буфы/O
бычок/O
валеночек/O
варшавянин/O
вдовец/O
веерок/O
вензелек/O
венценосец/O
верстачок/O
весны/O
ветроколеса/O
вещмешок/O
вилок/O
вирши/O
виточек/O
владелец/O
волжанин/O
волосок/O
вольнодумец/O
воробышек/O
ворота/O
вражий/O
времена/O
выборзок/O
вымысел/O
выродок/O
выходец/O
вьюрок/O
гадючий/O
галлы/O
гарнец/O
гвинеец/O
гениталии/O
гетерополисоединения/O
гидроксокомплексы/O
гидроресурсы/O
глазищи/O
глазочек/G
гликопротеины/O
гляделки/O
говорок/O
голосок/O
гоминиды/O
горец/O
горшок/O
гостинец/O
грабли/O
гребешок/O
грибок/O
грудничок/O
гусек/O
данаец/O
двоеженец/O
дебаты/O
девчачий/O
делец/O
денечек/O
деньжонки/O
десяток/O
детишки/O
джинсы/O
дионисии/O
добавок/O
довыборы/O
домовладелец/O
доспехи/O
древоточец/O
дрожжи/O
друзья/O
думец/O
дурий/O
дьячок/O
ежи/O
жабий/O
желток/O
жены/O
живец/O
жилец/O
завиток/O
загорбок/O
задок/O
зайцы/O
закуточек/O
замысел/O
запорожец/O
застенок/O
зачаток/O
зверек/O
звонарь/G
зевок/O
землепроходец/O
зерна/O
змееборец/O
значок/O
зубок/O
игрунок/O
извращенец/O
изонитрилы/O
израильтянин/O
именины/O
индонезиец/O
иноверец/O
иностранец/O
иракец/O
исландец/O
ишачий/O
кабардинец/O
казанок/O
кальсоны/O
каменья/O
канатоходец/O
канцтовары/O
карбованец/O
картишки/O
качели/O
киевлянин/O
клещи/O
клубень/O
кобзарь/G
кобылий/O
козни/O
колок/O
комелек/O
конец/O
корень/O
кортикостероиды/O
кошачий/O
краснофлотец/O
крестьянин/O
круглогубцы/O
крючья/O
кукушечий/O
куль/G
кумовья/O
курянин/O
лантаниды/O
латиноамериканец/O
ленинградец/O
лесоторговец/O
липиды/O
лихоимец/O
локоть/O
лохмотья/O
любимец/O
мазок/O
малец/O
марокканец/O
матерок/G
маячок/O
меринок/O
мешочек/O
микроудобрения/O
миротворец/O
мокшанин/O
молоток/O
морячок/O
муженек/O
мхи/O
назначенец/O
народец/O
небеса/O
недоумок/O
ненец/O
нечистоты/O
ноготок/O
норвежец/O
нуклеопротеиды/O
обновленец/O
образец/O
овражек/O
огарочек/G
огонек/O
однодворец/O
окисел/O
олигосахариды/O
оргвыводы/O
оруженосец/O
остаток/O
отголосок/O
отрепки/O
охи/O
павий/O
палешанин/O
парень/O
пассатижи/O
пащенок/O
пень/O
перевыборы/O
перепродавец/O
перечень/O
перуанец/O
петроградец/O
писец/O
платежи/O
пловец/O
поводок/O
погремок/O
подголосок/O
подлавок/O
подранок/O
подчалок/O
полати/O
полинезиец/O
половец/O
полудурок/O
полынья/G
помазок/O
помочи/O
порошочек/O
порядок/O
посланец/O
потроха/O
праотец/O
пригорок/O
прирезок/O
прихожанин/O
пролежень/O
простенок/O
прудок/O
псковитянин/O
пупырышек/O
пучочек/O
рабовладелец/O
разбойничек/O
раскольничий/O
рвы/O
редуценты/O
репейничек/G
решета/O
родничок/O
росток/O
румянец/O
рыботорговец/O
садок/O
самаритянин/O
санки/O
сборничек/O
свинячий/O
северянин/O
сельчанин/O
середнячок/O
сицилиец/O
сколок/O
сластолюбец/O
слиток/O
словарь/G
смешок/O
снимок/O
собратья/O
соловьи/O
сосок/O
спилок/O
станок/O
стебелек/O
стихотворец/O
страдалец/O
строчок/O
суданец/O
сумерки/O
сучий/O
счеты/O
сюртучок/O
тараканий/O
телец/O
тигли/O
толстовец/O
торфоразработки/O
трусики/O
тулья/G
тупоумок/O
тючок/O
уголок/O
украинец/O
уровень/O
участок/O
финансы/O
флигелек/O
францисканец/O
хиноны/O
хлопок/O
холодец/O
хохолок/O
царек/O
циклоалканы/O
часок/O
черепаший/O
чертенята/O
чилиец/O
чужанин/O
шаровары/O
швея/G
шершень/O
шнурочек/O
шурья/O
щенята/O
экзоты/O
эпизодец/O
юнец/O
японец/O
